Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-626.05
Wheeling service; contract; dispute; exception; board; settlement.

When a power agency has requested wheeling service under sections 70-626.01 to 70-626.03, the parties shall develop a contract for such wheeling service. Any provisions of the contract which cannot be resolved by the parties shall then be the subject of a dispute filed with the board for settlement. The provisions of this section shall not include the matter of rates to be paid for such wheeling service in the contract.

Laws 1969, c. 550, § 5, p. 2208.